Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 2. Belle Fourche River Compact

§ 41-12-201.
Purpose.

The major purposes of this compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

] are to provide for the most efficient use of the waters of the Belle Fourche River basin hereinafter referred to as the basin for multiple purposes; to provide for an equitable division of such waters; to remove all causes, present and future, which might lead to controversies; to promote interstate comity; to recognize that the most efficient utilization of the waters within the basin is required for the full development of the basin; and to promote joint action by the states and the United States in the efficient use of water and the control of floods.

The physical and other conditions peculiar to the basin constitute the basis for this compact; and none of the states hereby, nor the congress of the United States by its consent, concedes that this compact establishes any general principle or precedent with respect to any other interstate stream.

Either state and all others using, claiming or in any manner asserting any right to the use of the waters of the Belle Fourche River under the authority of that state, shall be subject to the terms of this compact.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-2701; W.S. 1957, § 41-488.

Preamble. —

“Whereas, the twenty-sixth Wyoming legislature passed an act entitled ‘An act relating to the appointment of interstate streams commission and assistant commissioners to negotiate agreements relative to interstate streams and providing for the governor of Wyoming to notify the governors of other states as to the appointment of said commissioners, detailing the authority of said commissioners,’ which said act was approved on the 24th day of February, 1941, by the governor; and

“Whereas, under the authority of said act, the state engineer, L. C. Bishop, acted as commissioner, and Samuel McKean, L. H. Robinson and Mrs. E. E. McKean acted as assistant commissioners, who, together with the duly appointed commissioners of the state of South Dakota, and Howard R. Stinson, the representative of the United States of America, negotiated a compact or agreement now called the Belle Fourche River Compact and which was signed on the 18th day of February, A.D. 1943, at the city of Cheyenne in the state of Wyoming; and

“Whereas, the said act of the twenty-sixth Wyoming legislature further contained the following provision: that any such compact or compacts, agreement or agreements so entered into by such states and the United States shall not be binding or obligatory upon any of the contracting parties thereto unless or until the same shall have been ratified and approved by the legislature of each of such states and the congress of the United States.”

Section 1. Ratification. —

“Ratification and approval is hereby given to the Belle Fourche River Compact as signed at the city of Cheyenne in the state of Wyoming on the 18th day of February, A.D. 1943, by L. C. Bishop, the state engineer and interstate streams commissioner of the state of Wyoming, and the above named assistant commissioners, under and in accordance with the authority of the act of the twenty-sixth Wyoming legislature approved on the 24th day of February, 1941, entitled “An act relating to the appointment of interstate streams commissioner and assistant commissioners to negotiate agreements relative to interstate streams and providing for the governor of Wyoming to notify the governors of other states as to the appointment of said commissioner, detailing the authority of said commissioner,” which compact was also signed by the duly authorized commissioners of the state of South Dakota and approved by the representative of the United States, which Belle Fourche River Compact is in full as follows

“The states of South Dakota and Wyoming, parties signatory to this compact hereinafter referred to as South Dakota and Wyoming, respectively, or individually as a state, or collectively as the states, have resolved to conclude a compact as authorized under the act of congress of February 26, 1927, Chapter 216, 44 Stat. 1247, and, after negotiations participated in by the following named state commissioners.

“Belle Fourche River Compact

“For South Dakota:

M. Q. Sharpe

G. W. Morsman

S. G. Mortimer

W. D. Buchholz

“For Wyoming:

L. C. Bishop

Samuel McKean

L. H. Robinson

Mrs. E. E. McKean

and by Howard R. Stinson, appointed as the representative of the United States of America, have agreed upon the following articles, to wit:

“Here follows body of the compact, §§

41-12-201

to

41-12-215

, herein, the witness clause and the signatures of the commissioners.

Section 2. Effective on ratification and notice thereof. —

“Said compact shall not be binding or obligatory upon any of the high contracting parties thereto unless and until the same shall have been ratified by the legislature of each of the said states and approved by the congress of the United States. The governor of Wyoming shall give notice of the ratification and approval of said compact by the Wyoming legislature to the governors of each of the said states and to the President of the United States.

Section 3. McKean or Carlisle Damsite — Permit for reservoir. —

“As required by chapter 125, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1939 [repealed in 1945], authority is hereby granted to the state engineer to grant a permit for the building of a reservoir with the damsite in section 22, township 51 north, range 66 west, 6th principal meridian in Crook county, Wyoming, known as the McKean or Carlisle damsite.”

§ 41-12-202.
Definitions.

As used in this compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

]:

The term “Belle Fourche River” shall mean and include the Belle Fourche River and all its tributaries originating in Wyoming;

The term “basin” shall mean that area in South Dakota and Wyoming which is naturally drained by the Belle Fourche River, and all its tributaries;

The term “beneficial use” is herein defined to be that use by which the water supply of a drainage basin is depleted when usefully employed by the activities of man, and includes water lost by evaporation, and other natural causes from streams, canals, ditches, irrigated areas, and reservoirs;

Where the name of the state or the term “state” or “states” is used, these shall be construed to include any person or entity of any nature whatsoever using, claiming, or in any manner asserting any right to the use of the waters of the Belle Fourche River under the authority of that state.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-2702; W.S. 1957, § 41-489.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-12-203.
Administration.

It shall be the duty of the two (2) states to administer this compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

] through the official in each state who is now or may hereafter be charged with the duty of administering the public water supplies, and to collect and correlate through such officials the data necessary for the proper administration of the provisions of this compact. Such officials may, by unanimous action, adopt rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this compact.

The United States geological survey, or whatever federal agency may succeed to the functions and duties of that agency, insofar as this compact is concerned, shall collaborate with the officials of the states charged with the administration of this compact in the execution of the duty of such officials in the collection, correlation, and publication of information necessary for the proper administration of this compact.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-2703; W.S. 1957, § 41-490.

§ 41-12-204.
Water gauging stations.

Each state shall itself or in conjunction with other responsible agencies cause to be established, maintained, and operated such suitable water gauging stations as it finds necessary to administer this compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

].

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-2704; W.S. 1957, § 41-491.

§ 41-12-205.
Allocation of waters.

Wyoming and South Dakota agree that the unappropriated waters of the Belle Fourche River as of the date of this compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

] shall be allocated to each state as follows: Ninety percent (90%) to South Dakota Ten percent (10%) to Wyoming; provided, that allocations to Wyoming shall be exclusive of the use of these waters for domestic and stock use, and Wyoming shall be allowed unrestricted use for these purposes, except that no reservoir for such use shall exceed twenty (20) acre-feet in capacity. For storage of its allocated water, Wyoming shall have the privilege of purchasing at cost not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the total storage capacity for any reservoir or reservoirs constructed in Wyoming for irrigation of lands in South Dakota, or may construct reservoirs itself for the purpose of utilizing such water. Either state may temporarily divert, or store for beneficial use, any unused part of the above percentages allotted to the other, but no continuing right shall be established thereby.

Rights to the use of the waters of the Belle Fourche River, whether based on direct diversion or storage, are hereby recognized as of the date of this compact to the extent these rights are valid under the law of the state in which the use is made, and shall remain unimpaired hereby. These rights, together with the additional allocations made under (a) of this section, are agreed to be an equitable apportionment between the states of the waters of the basin.

The waters allocated under subsection (a) of this section and the rights recognized under subsection (b) of this section are hereinafter referred to collectively as the apportioned water. For the purposes of the administration of this compact and determining the apportioned water at any given date within a given calendar year, there shall be taken the sum of:

The quantity of water in acre-feet that passed the Wyoming-South Dakota state line during the period from January 1 of that year to that given date;

The quantity of water in acre-feet in storage on that date in all reservoirs built in Wyoming on the Belle Fourche River subsequent to the date of this compact.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 5; C.S. 1945, § 71-2705; W.S. 1957, § 41-492.

§ 41-12-206.
Acquisition of property in another state.

Any person, entity, or state shall have the right to acquire necessary property rights in another state by purchase or through the exercise of the power of eminent domain for the construction, operation and maintenance of storage reservoirs and of appurtenant works, canals, and conduits required for the enjoyment of the privileges granted by W.S.

41-12-205

and 41-12-207(a); provided, however, that the grantees of such rights shall pay to the political subdivisions of the state in which such works are located, each and every year during which such rights are enjoyed for such purposes, a sum of money equivalent to the average annual amount of taxes assessed against the lands and improvements thereon during the ten (10) years preceding the use of such lands in reimbursement for the loss of taxes to said political subdivisions of the state.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 6; C.S. 1945, § 71-2706; W.S. 1957, § 41-493.

§ 41-12-207.
Construction and use of dams; claims for storage or diversion; appropriations.

Either state shall have the right, by compliance with the laws of the other state, to file applications for and receive permits to construct or participate in the construction and use of any dam, storage reservoir, or diversion works in such state for the purpose of conserving and regulating the apportioned water of the other state; provided, that such right is subject to the rights of the other state to control, regulate, and use water apportioned to it.

Each claim hereafter initiated for storage or diversion of water in one (1) state for use in another state shall be filed in the office of the state engineer of the state in which the water is to be stored or diverted, and a duplicate copy of the application including a map showing the character and location of the proposed facilities and the lands to be irrigated shall be filed in the office of the state engineer of the state in which the water is to be used. If a portion or all the lands proposed to be reclaimed are located in a state other than the one (1) in which the water is to be restored or diverted, then, before approval of the application shall be granted, said application shall be checked against the records of the appropriate office of the state in which the water is to be used, and a notation shall be placed thereon by the officer in charge of such records to the effect that the land description does not indicate a conflict with existing water rights. All endorsements shall be placed on both the original and duplicate copies of all such maps filed to the end that the records in both states may be complete and identical.

Appropriations may hereafter be adjudicated in the state in which the water is stored or diverted, and where a portion or all the lands irrigated are in the other state, such adjudications shall be confirmed in the latter state by the proper authority. Each adjudication is to conform with the laws of the state where the water is stored or diverted and shall be recorded in the county and state where the water is used.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 7; C.S. 1945, § 71-2707; W.S. 1957, § 41-494.

§ 41-12-208.
Water for stock water use in South Dakota.

In case any reservoir is constructed in Wyoming to be used principally for irrigation of lands in South Dakota, sufficient water not to exceed ten (10) cubic feet per second shall be released at all times for stock water use.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 8; C.S. 1945, § 71-2708; W.S. 1957, § 41-495.

§ 41-12-209.
Size of reservoirs.

No reservoir hereafter built solely to utilize the water allocated to Wyoming shall have a capacity in excess of one thousand (1,000) acre-feet.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 9; C.S. 1945, § 71-2709; W.S. 1957, § 41-496.

§ 41-12-210.
Duration of compact.

The provisions of this compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

] shall remain in full force and effect until amended by action of the legislature of the states and consented to and approved by the congress of the United States in the same manner as this compact is required to be ratified to become effective.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 10; C.S. 1945, § 71-2710; W.S. 1957, § 41-497.

§ 41-12-211.
Termination of compact.

This compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

] may be terminated at any time by unanimous consent of the states, and upon such termination, all rights then established hereunder or recognized hereby shall continue to be recognized as valid by the states notwithstanding the termination of the other provisions of the compact.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 11; C.S. 1945, § 71-2711; W.S. 1957, § 41-498.

§ 41-12-212.
Rights of action preserved.

Nothing in this compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

] shall be construed to limit or prevent either state from instituting or maintaining any action or proceeding, legal or equitable, in any federal court or the United States supreme court for the protection of any right under this compact or the enforcement of any of its provisions.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 12; C.S. 1945, § 71-2712; W.S. 1957, § 41-499.

§ 41-12-213.
Application of compact.

Nothing in this compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

] shall be deemed:

To impair or affect any rights or powers of the United States, its agencies, or instrumentalities, in and to the use of the waters of the Belle Fourche River nor its capacity to acquire rights in and to the use of said waters;

To subject any property of the United States, its agencies, or instrumentalities to taxation by either state or subdivision thereof, or to create an obligation on the part of the United States, its agencies, or instrumentalities, by reason of the acquisition, construction or operation of any property or works of whatsoever kind, to make any payments to any state or political subdivision thereof, state agency, municipality, or entity whatsoever in reimbursement for the loss of taxes;

To subject any property of the United States, its agencies, or instrumentalities, to the laws of any state to an extent other than the extent to which these laws would apply without regard to the compact.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 13; C.S. 1945, § 71-2713; W.S. 1957, § 41-500.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-12-214.
When compact becomes operative.

This compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

] shall become operative when approved by the legislature of each of the states, and when consented to by the congress of the United States by legislation providing, among other things, that:

Any beneficial uses hereafter made by the United States, or those acting by or under its authority, within a state, of the waters allocated by this compact, shall be within the allocations hereinabove made for use in that state and shall be taken into account in determining the extent of use within that state;

The United States, or those acting by or under its authority, in the exercise of rights or powers arising from whatever jurisdiction the United States has in, over and to the waters of the Belle Fourche River and all its tributaries, shall recognize, to the extent consistent with the best utilization of the waters for multiple purposes, that beneficial use of the waters within the basin is of paramount importance to development of the basin, and no exercise of such power or right thereby that would interfere with the full beneficial use of the waters shall be made except upon a determination, giving due consideration to the objectives of this compact and after consultation with all interested federal agencies and the state officials charged with the administration of this compact, that such exercise is in the interest of the best utilization of such waters for multiple purposes;

The United States, or those acting by or under its authority, will recognize any established use, for domestic and irrigation purposes, of the apportioned waters which may be impaired by the exercise of federal jurisdiction in, over, and to such waters; provided, that such use is being exercised beneficially, is valid under the laws of the appropriate state and in conformity with this compact at the time of the impairment thereof, and was validly initiated under state law prior to the initiation or authorization of the federal program or project which causes such impairment.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 14; C.S. 1945, § 71-2714; W.S. 1957, § 41-501.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-12-215.
Severability of provisions.

Should a court of competent jurisdiction hold any part of this compact [§§

41-12-201

through

41-12-215

] to be contrary to the constitution of any state or of the United States, all other severable provisions shall continue in full force and effect.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 117, § 1, art. 15; C.S. 1945, § 71-2715; W.S. 1957, § 41-502.